Hawaii statutes.
[§668A-4] Service; notice by posting.
(a) This chapter does not limit or affect the method by which service of a
complaint in an action for partition may be made.

(b) If an order of service by publication of
the summons for an action for partition of real property is granted and the
court determines that the property may be heirs property, the plaintiff, not
later than ten days after the court's determination, shall post, and maintain
while the action is pending, a conspicuous sign on the property that is the
subject of the action. The sign shall state that the action has commenced and
identify the name and address of the court and the common designation by which
the property is known. The court may require the plaintiff to publish on the
sign the name of the plaintiff and the known defendants. [L 2016, c 260, pt of
§1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next